California statutes. Penal Code
The State Department of Health Services shall prepare standardized forms for the reports, notices, and findings required by this title, and distribute these forms to the Department of Corrections, the Department of the Youth Authority, and to each county health officer within three months of the effective date of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1579, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

7551.

A correctional, custodial, or law enforcement agency to which this title applies shall be responsible for informing staff of the provisions of this title, and assisting in its implementation as it applies to the respective agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1579, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

7552.

(a) It is recommended that every city or county correctional, custodial, and law enforcement agency to which this title applies have a comprehensive AIDS and HIV prevention and education program in operation by March 31, 1989. Recommended goals for the programs include all of the following:

(1) Education. Implementation of an educational plan which includes education and training for officers, support staff, and inmates on the prevention and transmission of HIV, with regular updates, at least every three months, with all persons held in custody for at least 12 hours in a correctional institution being provided at least with a pamphlet approved by the county health officer, and more detailed education for persons kept beyond three days.

(2) Body fluid precautions. Because all bodily fluids are considered as potentially infectious, supplying all employees of correctional institutions with the necessary equipment and supplies to follow accepted universal bodily fluids precautions, including gloves and devices to administer cardiopulmonary resuscitation, when dealing with infected persons or those in high-risk groups for HIV or hepatitis B or C.

(3) Separate housing for infected individuals. Making available adequate separate housing facilities for housing inmates who have tested positive for HIV infection and who continue to engage in activities which transmit HIV, with facilities comparable to those of other inmates with access to recreational and educational facilities, commensurate with the facilities available in the correctional institution.

(4) Adequate AIDS medical services. The provision of medical services appropriate for the diagnosis and treatment of HIV infection.

(5) These guidelines are advisory only and do not constitute a state mandate.

(b) The program shall require confidentiality of information in accordance with this title and other provisions of law.

(c) The Corrections Standards Authority and the State Department of Health Services shall assist in developing the programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 800, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7553.

With the approval of the county health officer, the State Department of Health Services, as it deems necessary for HIV detection and prevention, may conduct periodic anonymous unlinked serologic surveys of all or portions of the inmate population or persons under custody within a city or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1579, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

7554.

(a) The purpose of this section is to establish the extent of peace officers’ occupational exposure for HIV infection.

(b) The correctional, custodial, or law enforcement agency to which this title applies or the chief medical officer of a correctional, custodial, or law enforcement agency to which this title applies shall report each reportable incident involving a law enforcement employee under this title together with the disposition of each case to the State Department of Health Services. 

The report shall include all of the following: the assignment of the law enforcement employee; the type of incident; the type of injury sustained; the treatment rendered to the injured employee; citations to criminal laws which were allegedly violated; and the identity of the employing agency. Under no circumstances shall the identity of the law enforcement employee or the source person be transmitted by the local law enforcement agency or the chief medical officer of the local agency to the State Department of Health Services. 

(c) The State Department of Health Services shall release the data, upon written request, to any law enforcement agency or to any bona fide, nonprofit law enforcement research body primarily concerned with peace officer health issues, provided that the identity of any law enforcement employee, any person who is the subject of a report, or any tested person under this title shall remain anonymous. Any unauthorized release of information leading to the identity of a person whose identity is protected under this section shall constitute a misdemeanor. 

(d) For purposes of this section, a “reportable incident” means an incident described in subdivision (a) of Section 7510. A “source person” means a person whose bodily fluids are believed to have contacted the bodily fluids of a law enforcement employee as described in subdivision (a) of Section 7510.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 713, Sec. 26.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 8.7. EXAMINATION OF INMATES AND WARDS FOR TUBERCULOSIS [7570. - 7576.]

7570.

In enacting this chapter, the Legislature hereby finds and declares that tuberculosis is a serious contagious disease. It is vital to the health and safety of inmates, employees, and the public at large, to conduct appropriate examinations, testing, and treatment in order to control the spread of tuberculosis in California’s institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 932, Sec. 9.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7571.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Chief medical officer” means the chief medical officer or acting chief medical officer of a state prison or any facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections or the Department of the Youth Authority.

(b) “Inmate or ward” means any person incarcerated within the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections or the Department of the Youth Authority, with the exception of a person on parole.

(c) “Institution” means any state prison, camp, center, office, or other facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections or the Department of the Youth Authority.

(d) “Examination, test, or treatment” means methods, processes, or other means, including medical evaluations, testing, followup examinations, or treatment, in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and as specified in the guidelines for tuberculosis control of the Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority.

(e) “Medical evaluation” means taking a history or gathering other information and may include, but is not limited to, listening to the chest or other examinations or tests as specified in the guidelines for tuberculosis control of the Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority.

(f) “Department” means the Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority.

(g) “Chief of medical services” means the medical officer, acting medical officer, or designee responsible for all medical services of the Department of Corrections or the Department of the Youth authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 932, Sec. 9.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7572.

The chief of medical services, or his or her designee, shall use every available means to ascertain the existence of, and to immediately investigate all reported or suspected cases of, tuberculosis in the infectious stages and to ascertain the source or sources of the infections. In carrying out these investigations, the chief of medical services, or his or her designee, is hereby invested with full powers of inspection, examination, and quarantine or isolation of all inmates or wards known to be, or reasonably suspected to be, infected with tuberculosis in an infectious stage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 932, Sec. 9.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7573.

(a) The chief medical officer shall order an inmate or ward to receive an examination or test, or may order an inmate or ward to receive treatment if the medical officer has a reasonable suspicion that the inmate or ward has, has had, or has been exposed to tuberculosis in an infectious stage and the chief medical officer has reasonable grounds to believe that it is necessary for the preservation and protection of staff and inmates or wards.

(b) The chief medical officer shall ensure that examinations or tests for tuberculosis on all inmates or wards are conducted upon incarceration and at least annually thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 932, Sec. 9.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.

Notwithstanding Section 2600 or 2601, or any other provision of law, any inmate or ward who refuses to submit to an examination, test, or treatment for tuberculosis as described in Section 7572 or 7573, or who refuses treatment for tuberculosis, or who, after notice, violates, or refuses or neglects to conform to, any rule, order, guideline, or regulation prescribed by the department with regard to tuberculosis control shall be tested involuntarily and may be treated involuntarily. This inmate or ward shall be subject to disciplinary action as described in Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 932, Sec. 9.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7575.

To provide effective control of the spread of tuberculosis in institutions and to identify those among the inmate and ward populations with tuberculosis, the Department of Corrections shall operate pursuant to guidelines developed in consultation with the State Department of Health Services, which shall be adopted on or before July 1, 1994. The guidelines shall include, but not be limited to, establishing a reporting system which emphasizes standardized, uniform data collection, reporting, and assessment, as specified in Section 7576.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 932, Sec. 9.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7576.

(a) The Department of Corrections, the Department of the Youth Authority, the Board of Prison Terms, and the Youthful Offender Parole Board shall compile information through each department’s respective reporting systems for individual institutions and each respective department as a whole and shall provide the results to the State Department of Health Services annually. The information reported shall consist of the following:

(1) Prevalence rates and conversion rates (tuberculin incidence) for tuberculosis infection for inmates or wards and staff in each institution.

(2) Case numbers and case rates for tuberculosis disease for inmates or wards in each institution.

(b) Subject to additional staffing resources provided through the state budget process, the departments described in subdivision (a) shall also compile the following information for individual institutions and each respective department as a whole and shall provide the results to the State Department of Health Services annually:

(1) Percentage of inmates and wards with tuberculosis disease who complete the prescribed course of directly observed curative therapy in accordance with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recommendations and as specified in the department’s guidelines for tuberculosis control.

(2) Percentage of inmates and wards with culture positive sputum that convert to culture negative in accordance with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recommendations and as specified in the department’s guidelines for tuberculosis control.

(3) Percentage of inmates and wards with tuberculosis who complete the prescribed INH (isoniazid) or other appropriate directly observed preventive therapy in accordance with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recommendations and as specified in the department’s guidelines for tuberculosis control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 932, Sec. 9.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 9. PUNISHMENT OPTIONS [8000. - 9003.]



  CHAPTER 1. Programs With Special Focus on Substance Abuse [8000. - 8002.]

8000.

The Legislature finds and declares that the existence of live-in alternative to incarceration rehabilitation programs with special focus on substance abusers provide a useful alternative to incarceration and promotes the resumption of useful lives by persons with impairments caused by drug or alcohol abuse, or persons with criminal records who, because of these impairments, cannot be absorbed into the competitive labor market, or who otherwise have little or no chance of rehabilitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 398, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8001.

For purposes of this title, a live-in alternative to incarceration rehabilitation program with special focus on substance abusers means any long-term (two-year minimum) private, nonprofit program that has operated and complied with the following conditions for at least five years prior to the effective date of this section:

(a) Participants live full time at the program site and receive room and board, and all necessary support at no cost to the participant.

(b) All necessary support shall include reasonable medical, dental, psychological, and legal services, counseling, entertainment, clothing, academic, life-skills, and interpersonal education, vocational training, rehabilitation, transportation, and recreation activities.

(c) Neither the directors nor the officers of the program shall be compensated in any manner other than the manner in which the participants of the program are compensated.

(d) The program shall not be operated with any public funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 398, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8002.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the participants, director, and staff of a live-in alternative to incarceration rehabilitation program with special focus on substance abusers, when participating in operations owned and operated by the program, are exempt from the wage and hour provisions and Section 1025 of the Labor Code, so long as all revenues generated by the operation are used for the support of the program. All providers who bid on public work shall include in their bid the prevailing wage rate as required by the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 398, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Community-Based Punishment Act [8050. - 8093.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [8050. - 8052.]

8050.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Community-Based Punishment Act of 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8051.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(a) Community-based punishment programs require a partnership between the state and local government to provide and expand the use of intermediate sanctions for specifically targeted offender populations.

(b) Community-based programs must operate to punish offenders while at the same time providing opportunities to change behavior.

(c) Community-based punishment programs provide appropriate means of managing select offenders but should not be viewed as the only solution to prison overcrowding.

(d) Community-based punishment programs target prison-bound and jail-bound nonviolent offenders because this group poses the least risk to the public and is the most amenable to the individualized programming and services offered by community-based programs.

(e) Community-based punishment programs emphasize reducing local jail populations, thereby making jail space available for new commitments, parole violators, and probation violators who are now being sent to jail and nonviolent felons who have already been sent to prison for short periods of time.

(f) Community-based punishment programs must be financed from a consistent, reliable, and separate funding source.

(g) Community-based punishment programs should be expanded incrementally with a variety of pilot approaches tested to determine their effectiveness prior to expansion.

(h) In order to effectively utilize available resources, to ensure appropriate management of the local offender population, each county utilizing community-based punishment programs must implement a locally coordinated planning process.

(i) Since successful community-based punishment programs are dependent on the coordinated efforts of, and successful working relationships between, state and local agencies, the Board of Corrections is the logical state agency to coordinate community punishment efforts because of its extensive experience with collaborative state and local programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8052.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Board” means the Board of Corrections, unless otherwise indicated.

(b) “Chief correctional administrator” means the sheriff, chief probation officer, or director of the county department of corrections, who is designated by the board of supervisors to have administrative responsibility for county corrections operations and programs, including a community-based punishment program.

(c) “Community-based punishment” means a partnership between the state and a county or a collaboration of counties to manage and provide correctional services, especially those services considered to be intermediate sanctions at the local level of government for targeted, select offender populations pursuant to the community corrections plan of a county or a collaboration of counties.

(d) “Community-based punishment plan” means the proposal for a community-based punishment program promulgated by a county or a collaboration of counties that has been developed by the chief correctional administrator, in cooperation with the district attorney, public defender, and other concerned community representatives designated by the board of supervisors, to address correctional needs in that county or collaboration of counties.

(e) “Intermediate sanctions” means punishment options and sanctions other than simple incarceration in prison or jail or traditional routine probation supervision. Intermediate sanctions may be provided by correctional agencies directly or through community-based public or private correctional service providers, and include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Short-term “shock” incarceration in either jail or prison, for a period of not more than 60 days.

(2) Incarceration in a “boot camp” facility.

(3) Intensive supervision.

(4) Home detention with electronic monitoring.

(5) Mandatory community service.

(6) Restorative justice programs such as mandatory victim restitution and victim-offender reconciliation.

(7) Work, training, or education in a furlough program pursuant to Section 1208.

(8) Work, in lieu of confinement, in a work release program pursuant to Section 4024.2.

(9) Day reporting.

(10) Mandatory residential or nonresidential substance abuse treatment programs established pursuant to Chapter 9.4 (commencing with Section 6240) of Title 7.

(11) Mandatory random drug testing.

(12) Mother-infant care programs.

(13) Community-based residential programs offering structure, supervision, drug treatment, alcohol treatment, literacy programming, employment counseling, psychological counseling, or any combination of these and other interventions.

(f) “Nonviolent offender” means a person who is not currently charged with a violent crime, as defined in Section 667.5, does not have a criminal record that includes a violent crime, meets the National Institute of Corrections (NIC) Model Classification System guidelines for classification as a nonviolent offender, and does not pose a risk to the community, as determined by the correctional administrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Administration [8060. - 8061.]

8060.

This chapter shall be administered by the board. The board shall be responsible for ensuring that the policies and activities undertaken by state or local governmental units, or other organizations, in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter, are consistent with those purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8061.

The board, in collaboration with state, local, and community-based departments, agencies, and organizations shall do the following:

(a) Describe the parameters of effective community-based punishment programs and the relationship between the state and local jurisdictions in meeting the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Develop and implement a process by which local jurisdictions are selected and can participate in pilot efforts initiated under this chapter.

(c) Develop and implement the process by which counties participating in accordance with this chapter annually submit their
 community-based punishment program proposals for approval, modification, or both.

(d) Design and implement a process for annually awarding funds to counties participating pursuant to this chapter to implement their community-based punishment program proposals, and administer and monitor the receipt, expenditure, and reporting of those funds by participating counties.

(e) Provide technical assistance and support to counties and community correctional administrators in determining whether to participate in community-based punishment programs, and in either developing or annually updating their punishment programs.

(f) Facilitate the sharing of information among counties and between county and state agencies relative to community-based punishment approaches and programs being initiated or already in existence, strengths
 and weaknesses of specific programs, specific offender groups appropriate for different programs, results of program evaluations and other data, and anecdotal material that may assist in addressing the purposes of this chapter.

(g) Adopt and periodically revise regulations necessary to implement this chapter.

(h) Design and provide for regular and rigorous evaluation of the community-based punishment programming undertaken pursuant to approved community-based punishment plans.

(i) Design and provide for analysis and evaluation of the pilot and any subsequent implementation of this chapter, with areas of analysis to include, at a minimum, the following:

(1) The relationship between the board and counties or collaborations of counties submitting county
 community-based punishment plans.

(2) The effectiveness of this chapter in encouraging the use of intermediate as well as traditional sanctions.

(3) The categories of offenders most suitable for specific intermediate sanctions, various aspects of community-based punishment programming, or both.

(4) The effectiveness of the programs implemented pursuant to this chapter in maintaining public safety.

(5) The cost-effectiveness of the programs implemented pursuant to this chapter.

(6) The effect of the programs implemented pursuant to this chapter on prison, jail, and Department of the Youth Authority populations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 130.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Community-Based Punishment Plan [8080. - 8080.]

8080.

Each county or collaboration of counties electing to operate a community-based punishment program under this chapter shall develop a community-based punishment plan describing the continuum of sanctions and services comprising its program. The plan shall be developed pursuant to guidelines established by the board and shall be updated annually or as determined by the board. The plan shall describe, at a minimum, the following:

(a) System design and administration, lines of authority, and responsible personnel, including, but not limited to, the chief correctional administrator and other relevant individuals.

(b) The extent and nature of citizen involvement in the development and promulgation of the community-based punishment plan, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Consultation with a citizens’ advisory committee formed for the purpose of providing community input into the development and promulgation of a community-based punishment plan.

(2) Consultation with selected community leaders.

(3) Input derived from citizen testimony at public hearings or town hall meetings.

(c) The number and kind of offenders to participate in community-based punishment programs.

(d) Eligibility requirements.

(e) How offenders, including those coming from the courts and those who are probation and parole violators, are to be selected to participate.

(f) Community-based punishment program components, including, for example, which punishment options, intermediate sanctions, treatment options, or combinations are to be developed and used for which offenders.

(g) Responsibilities and relationships, including, but not limited to, the elements of community-based punishment programs that are administered by the sheriff’s department, the probation department, or parole personnel, and when and how offenders are to be programmed.

(h) Criteria for transferring offenders from more restrictive to less restrictive sanctions.

(i) Criteria for disciplinary interventions, imposition of stricter sanctions, or return to prison or jail, when necessary.

(j) Anticipated costs and funding needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Funding [8090. - 8093.]

8090.

Implementation of this chapter pursuant to Section 8060 is contingent upon the availability of funding. Funding for community-based punishment programs shall be administered by the board from funds appropriated by the Legislature. In addition to state funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act or other legislation, programs may be funded from a variety of sources, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Federal funds for community-based punishment programs.

(b) Private or corporate grants, or both.

(c) Service and administrative fees that may be charged to offenders who participate in community corrections programs, provided that no offender shall be denied entrance into a community-based punishment program solely for inability to pay fees.

(d) Income derived from community development corporations established as part of community-based punishment programs of a county or collaboration of counties, including, but not limited to, revenue generated by businesses owned and operated by community-based punishment programs, or by offender work programs, or by both, after the cost of operating and administering the business or work program has been paid.

(e) Other sources as may be identified as suitable for funding community corrections.

It is the intent of the Legislature that community corrections reduce the number of offenders who would be incarcerated in the state prison in the absence of a community-based punishment approach.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8091.

(a) From the amount of money appropriated for purposes of this chapter to the board, the board shall allocate block grants to counties or collaborations of counties that have passed a community corrections resolution, have applied for funding, and have complied with the administrative process as prescribed by the board.

(b) Each county or collaboration of counties shall maintain a complete and accurate accounting of all funds received pursuant to this section. These funds shall be used only for community-based punishment programs as authorized by this chapter and shall be used only as permitted by the regulations and guidelines established by the board.

(c) Unexpended funds provided to counties shall be returned to the board and may be reallocated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8092.

The board, in collaboration with its member and constituent agencies and departments, shall seek startup funding for community-based punishment planning and programming from public and private sources commencing as soon as practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8093.

The board shall monitor the expenditures and funds of participating counties and collaborations of counties to determine whether the funds are being expended in accordance with all the requirements of this chapter. If the board finds that a participating county or collaboration of counties is not acting in accordance with all of the requirements of this chapter, it shall notify the county or collaboration of counties regarding the points of noncompliance, and the county or collaboration of counties shall have 60 days to explain or justify its actions in writing to the board. If the explanation is not satisfactory or if the point of noncompliance cannot be promptly cured in the opinion of the board, the board may issue a notice of noncompliance and may suspend payment of the funds to be allocated to the county or collaboration of counties under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Sex Offender Management Board [9000. - 9003.]

9000.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Board” means the Sex Offender Management Board created in this chapter.

(b) “Sex Offender” means any person who is required to register as a sex offender under Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(c) “Treatment” means a set of specialized interventions delivered by qualified mental health professionals and designed to address the multiple psychological and physiological factors found to be associated with sexual offending.

(d) “Management” means a comprehensive and collaborative team approach to regulating, controlling, monitoring, and otherwise influencing the current and, insofar as is possible, the future behavior of sex offenders who are living in the community and are directly under the authority of the criminal justice system or of another governmental agency performing similar functions. The overriding purpose of management of sex offenders is to enhance community safety by preventing future sexual victimization. Management includes supervision and specialized treatment as well as a variety of other interventions.

(e) “Supervision” means a specialized approach to the process of overseeing, insofar as authority to do so is granted to the supervising agency, all significant aspects of the lives of sex offenders who are being managed, as described in subdivision (d). This approach includes traditional methods as well as techniques and tools specifically designed to respond to the risks to community safety raised by sex offenders. Supervision is one component of management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 338, Sec. 1.   Effective September 20, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.

(a) The California Sex Offender Management Board, which is hereby created under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, shall consist of 19 members. The membership of the board shall reflect, to the extent possible, representation of northern, central, and southern
 California, as well as both urban and rural areas. Each appointee to the board, regardless of the appointing authority, shall have the following characteristics:

(1) Substantial prior knowledge of issues related to sex offenders, at least insofar as related to the appointee’s own agency’s practices.

(2) Decisionmaking authority for, or direct access to those who have decisionmaking authority for, the agency or constituency represented.

(3) A willingness to serve on the board and a commitment to contribute to the board’s work.

(b) The membership of the board shall consist of the following persons:

(1) State government agencies:

(A) The Attorney General or a designee who shall be an authority in policy areas pertaining to sex offenders and shall have expertise in dealing with sex offender registration, notification, and enforcement.

(B) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or
 a designee who has expertise in parole policies and practices.

(C) The Director of the Division of Adult Parole
 Operations or a designee.

(D) One California state judge, appointed by the Judicial Council.

(E) The Director of State Hospitals or a designee who is a licensed mental health professional with recognized expertise in the treatment of sex offenders.

(F) The Executive Director of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration within the California Health and Human Services Agency or a designee who has expertise in the treatment or supervision of juvenile sex offenders.

(2) Local government agencies:

(A) Three members who represent law enforcement, appointed by the Governor. One member shall possess investigative expertise and one member shall have law enforcement duties that include registration and notification responsibilities, and one shall be a chief probation officer.

(B) One member who represents prosecuting attorneys, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. The member shall have expertise in dealing with adult sex offenders.

(C) One member who represents probation officers, appointed by the Speaker of the
 Assembly.

(D) One member who represents criminal defense attorneys, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(E) One member who is a county administrator, appointed by the Governor.

(F) One member who is a city manager or a designee, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(3) Nongovernmental agencies:

(A) Two members who are licensed mental health professionals with recognized experience in working with sex offenders and who can represent, through their established involvement in a
 formal statewide professional organization, those who provide evaluation and treatment for adult sex offenders, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(B) One member who is a licensed mental health professional with experience treating juvenile sex offenders and who can represent those who provide evaluation and treatment for juvenile sex offenders, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(C) Two members who are recognized experts in the field of sexual assault and represent sexual assault
 victims, both adults and children, and rape crisis centers, appointed by the Governor.

(c) The board shall appoint a chair from among the members appointed pursuant to subdivision (b). The chair shall serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the board.

(d) Each member of the board who is appointed pursuant to this section shall serve without compensation.

(e) If a board member is unable to adequately perform
 the required duties or is unable to attend more than three meetings in a single 12-month period, the member is subject to removal from the board by a majority vote of the full board.

(f) Any vacancy on the board as a result of the removal of a member shall be filled by the appointing authority of the removed member within 30 days of the vacancy.

(g) The board may create, at its discretion, subcommittees or task forces to address specific
 issues. These may include board members as well as invited experts and other participants.

(h) The board shall hire a coordinator who has relevant experience in policy research. The board may hire other staff as funding permits.

(i) In the course of performing its duties, the board shall, when possible, make use of the available resources of research agencies such as the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the California Research Bureau, the California State University system, including schools of public policy and criminology, and other similar sources of assistance.

(j) Staff support services for the board shall be provided by staff of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation as directed by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 22.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.

(a) The board shall address any issues, concerns, and problems related to the community management of sex offenders. The main objective of the board, which shall be used to guide the board in prioritizing resources and use of time, is to achieve safer communities by reducing victimization.

(b) The board shall conduct public hearings, as it deems necessary, to provide opportunities for gathering information and receiving input regarding the work of the board from concerned stakeholders and the public.

(c) The members of the board shall be immune from liability for good faith conduct under this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 541, Sec. 15.   (SB 384)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9003.

(a) On or before July 1, 2011, the board shall develop and update standards for certification of sex offender management professionals. All those professionals who provide sex offender management programs and risk assessments, pursuant to Section 290.09, shall be certified by the board according to these standards. The standards shall be published on the board’s Internet Web site. Professionals may apply to the board for certification on or after August 1, 2011.

(1) (A) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all sex offender management applicants, as defined by subdivision (a), for the purposes of obtaining
 information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state arrests or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(B) When received, the Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to this section. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the board.

(C) The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response to the board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (l) of Section 11105.

(D) The board shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2, for persons described in subdivision (a).
